Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.10.100

"Major line" defined.

The term "major line," whenever used in this code, shall be held and construed to mean the development of the work or courses of study in certain subjects to their fullest extent, leading to a degree or degrees in that subject.

[ 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28B.10.100. Prior: 1917 c 10 s 1; RRS s 4532. Formerly RCW 28.76.010.]